Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1701.04
Process; duty of sheriff to execute.

It shall be the duty of the sheriffs of the several counties to execute or serve all writs and process issued by any county court and to them directed and to return the same. For any neglect or refusal so to do, they may be proceeded against in the county court in the same manner as for neglect or refusal to execute or serve process issued out of the district court.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 24, p. 268;

R.S.1913, § 1227;

C.S.1922, § 1150;

C.S.1929, § 27-519;

R.S.1943, § 24-520;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 24-534;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 10.